Arkansas, session 2025, SB74.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REGULAR SALARIES - OPERATIONS. There is hereby established
for the Department of Veterans Affairs for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the
following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) SC015 SECRETARY OF VETERANS AFFAIRS 1 GRADE SE05
(2) U008U ADVA DIRECTOR 1 GRADE SE02
(3) L018N NURSE PRACTITIONER 1 GRADE MP04
(4) L002C NURSING DIRECTOR 2 GRADE MP04
(5) L009C NURSE MANAGER 1 GRADE MP03
(6) L019C REGISTERED NURSE COORDINATOR 1 GRADE MP02
*BSS011*
01/14/2025 2:25:29 PM BSS011

SB74
(7) L027C REGISTERED NURSE SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE MP02
(8) L032C REGISTERED NURSE - HOSPITAL 18 GRADE MP01
(9) D022N IT SENIOR PROJECT MANAGER 1 GRADE IT09
(10) D079C COMPUTER SUPPORT TECHNICIAN 1 GRADE IT02
(11) N197N NURSING HOME DIVISION DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS15
(12) L026N ADVA STATE VETERANS HOME ADMINISTRATOR 2 GRADE GS14
(13) A133C ADVA CHIEF FINANCIAL OFFICER 1 GRADE GS13
(14) G318C ADVA DIVISION DIRECTOR 2 GRADE GS13
(15) L111C ADVA NURSING HOME ASST ADMINISTRATOR 2 GRADE GS12
(16) R006C HUMAN RESOURCES ADMINISTRATOR 1 GRADE GS12
(17) A027C ACCOUNTING OPERATIONS MANAGER 1 GRADE GS11
(18) X223C ADVA QUALITY ASSURANCE ADMINISTRATOR 1 GRADE GS11
(19) A044C AUDIT COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS10
(20) M009C LICENSED CERTIFIED SOCIAL WORKER 2 GRADE GS09
(21) P004C PUBLIC INFORMATION MANAGER 1 GRADE GS09
(22) X038C QUALITY ASSURANCE MANAGER 2 GRADE GS09
(23) A082C ACCOUNTANT II 1 GRADE GS08
(24) S003C FOOD & BEVERAGE DIRECTOR 2 GRADE GS08
(25) R014C PERSONNEL MANAGER 1 GRADE GS08
(26) V004C PROCUREMENT MANAGER 1 GRADE GS08
(27) A041C PROGRAM FISCAL MANAGER 1 GRADE GS08
(28) X062C QUALITY ASSURANCE COORDINATOR 2 GRADE GS08
(29) G253C ADVA SERVICE OFFICER 11 GRADE GS07
(30) G237C ADVA CEMETERY MANAGER 2 GRADE GS07
(31) U009U ADVA VETERANS CHILD WELFARE DIR 1 GRADE GS07
(32) R024C ASSISTANT PERSONNEL MANAGER 1 GRADE GS07
(33) G159C DEPARTMENT BUSINESS COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS07
(34) P065C DEVELOPMENT SPECIALIST 2 GRADE GS07
(35) S017C MAINTENANCE COORDINATOR 2 GRADE GS07
(36) M024C RESIDENTIAL SERVICES MANAGER 1 GRADE GS07
(37) C037C ADMINISTRATIVE ANALYST 1 GRADE GS06
(38) L069C LICENSED PRACTICAL NURSE 40 GRADE GS06
(39) S033C MAINTENANCE SUPERVISOR 2 GRADE GS06
(40) C022C BUSINESS OPERATIONS SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS05
(41) V014C BUYER 1 GRADE GS05
(42) A091C FISCAL SUPPORT ANALYST 1 GRADE GS05
01/14/2025 2:25:29 PM BSS011

SB74
(43) R032C HUMAN RESOURCES PROGRAM REPRESENTATIVE 3 GRADE GS05
(44) V015C PURCHASING SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS05
(45) M065C RECREATIONAL ACTIVITY SUPERVISOR 2 GRADE GS05
(46) V018C WAREHOUSE MANAGER 1 GRADE GS05
(47) C056C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST III 2 GRADE GS04
(48) S044C FOOD PREPARATION MANAGER 1 GRADE GS04
(49) S046C MAINTENANCE TECHNICIAN 9 GRADE GS04
(50) C073C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST II 3 GRADE GS03
(51) L082C CERTIFIED NURSING ASSISTANT 146 GRADE GS03
(52) S056C FOOD PREPARATION SUPERVISOR 3 GRADE GS03
(53) S050C MAINTENANCE SPECIALIST 3 GRADE GS03
(54) C087C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST I 1 GRADE GS02
(55) S085C FOOD PREPARATION SPECIALIST 7 GRADE GS02
(56) S084C INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE GS02
(57) S089C FOOD PREPARATION TECHNICIAN 2 GRADE GS01
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 305

SECTION 2. APPROPRIATION - STATE OPERATIONS. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Veterans Affairs, to be payable from the
Miscellaneous Agencies Fund Account, for personal services and operating
expenses of the Department of Veterans Affairs - State Operations for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $1,328,091
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 476,999
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 197,906
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 69,594
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(04) AID TO COUNTY VETERANS' SERVICE
OFFICES 516,000
(05) PROMOTIONAL ITEMS 4,000
01/14/2025 2:25:29 PM BSS011

SB74
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $2,592,590

SECTION 3. EXTRA HELP - VETERANS' HOMES. There is hereby authorized,
for the Department of Veterans Affairs - Veterans' Homes for the 2025-2026
fiscal year, the following maximum number of part-time or temporary
employees, to be known as "Extra Help", payable from funds appropriated
herein for such purposes: thirty (30) temporary or part-time employees, when
needed, at rates of pay not to exceed those provided in the Uniform
Classification and Compensation Act, or its successor, or this act for the
appropriate classification.

SECTION 4. APPROPRIATION - VETERANS' HOMES - CASH. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Veterans Affairs, to be payable from the
cash fund deposited in the State Treasury as determined by the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State, for personal services and operating expenses of the
Department of Veterans Affairs - Veterans' Homes - Cash for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $11,198,689
(02) EXTRA HELP 45,339
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 4,810,335
(04) OVERTIME 550,000
(05) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 14,903,703
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 52,500
(C) PROF. FEES 1,176,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 313,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(06) PROMOTIONAL ITEMS 6,000
(07) SPECIAL MAINTENANCE 72,831
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $33,128,397

SECTION 5. APPROPRIATION - NW AR STATE VETERANS' HOME - CASH. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Veterans Affairs, to be payable
01/14/2025 2:25:29 PM BSS011

SB74
from the cash fund deposited in the State Treasury as determined by the Chief
Fiscal Officer of the State, for matching funds for land acquisition,
improvements, construction, renovation, and purchase of equipment for a State
Veterans' Home in Northwest Arkansas for the Department of Veterans Affairs -
NW AR State Veterans' Home - Cash for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) NW AR STATE VETERANS HOME $15,000,000

SECTION 6. APPROPRIATION - NW AR STATE VETERANS' HOME - FEDERAL. There
is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Veterans Affairs, to be payable
from the federal funds as designated by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the
State, for land acquisition, improvements, construction renovation, and
purchase of equipment for a State Veterans' Home in Northwest Arkansas for
the Department of Veterans Affairs - NW AR State Veterans Home - Federal for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) NW AR STATE VETERANS HOME - FEDERAL $30,000,000

SECTION 7. APPROPRIATION - VETERANS' CEMETERIES - STATE. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Veterans Affairs, to be payable
from the Miscellaneous Agencies Fund Account, for personal services and
operating expenses of the Department of Veterans Affairs - Veterans'
Cemeteries - State for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $688,586
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 286,867
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 158,350
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
01/14/2025 2:25:29 PM BSS011

SB74
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(04) CEMETERY REALIGNMENT AND MAINTENANCE 50,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $1,183,803

SECTION 8. EXTRA HELP - VETERANS' CEMETERIES - CASH. There is hereby
authorized, for the Department of Veterans Affairs - Veterans' Cemeteries -
Cash for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of part-time
or temporary employees, to be known as "Extra Help", payable from funds
appropriated herein for such purposes: five (5) temporary or part-time
employees, when needed, at rates of pay not to exceed those provided in the
Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, or its successor, or this act
for the appropriate classification.

SECTION 9. APPROPRIATION - VETERANS' CEMETERIES - CASH. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Veterans Affairs, to be payable
from the cash fund deposited in the State Treasury as determined by the Chief
Fiscal Officer of the State, for personal services and operating expenses of
the Department of Veterans Affairs - Veterans' Cemeteries - Cash for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $28,020
(02) EXTRA HELP 24,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 14,213
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 453,475
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 17,600
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 125,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(05) PROMOTIONAL ITEMS 6,500
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $668,808

01/14/2025 2:25:29 PM BSS011

SB74
SECTION 10. APPROPRIATION - MILITARY FUNERAL HONORS PROGRAM. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Veterans Affairs, to be payable
from the Military Funeral Honors Fund, for operating expenses of the
Department of Veterans Affairs - Military Funeral Honors Program for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MILITARY FUNERAL HONORS EXPENSES $45,900

SECTION 11. APPROPRIATION - NLR CEMETERY EXPANSION 2 - FEDERAL. There
is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Veterans Affairs, to be payable
from the federal funds as designated by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the
State, for construction and expansion expenses for the North Little Rock
Veterans' Cemetery of the Department of Veterans Affairs - NLR Cemetery
Expansion 2 - Federal for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) CONSTRUCTION AND EXPANSION EXPENSES $2,000,000

SECTION 12. APPROPRIATION - OPERATIONS - DIABLED VETERANS' SERVICES
OFFICE. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Veterans Affairs,
to be payable from the Miscellaneous Agencies Fund Account, for personal
services and operating expenses of the Department of Veterans Affairs -
Disabled Veteran's Services Office for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $33,205
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 15,547
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 3,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
01/14/2025 2:25:29 PM BSS011

SB74
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $51,752

SECTION 13. APPROPRIATION - OPERATIONS - ARKANSAS VETERANS' CHILD
WELFARE SERVICE. There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Veterans
Affairs, to be payable from the Miscellaneous Agencies Fund Account, for
personal services and operating expenses of the Department of Veterans
Affairs - Arkansas Veterans' Child Welfare Service for the fiscal year ending
June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $48,400
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 19,037
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 4,182
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(04) GRANTS/AID-ASSISTANCE TO MINOR
CHILDREN 107,762
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $179,381

SECTION 14. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
36 CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
ARKANSAS DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS. At the close of the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2025, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall authorize
up to $50,000 of the balance of funds remaining in the Miscellaneous Agencies
Fund Account for the Department of Veterans Affairs for operations to be
transferred into a sub-fund created within the Miscellaneous Agencies Fund
Account to support the state veteran cemetery realignment and maintenance
expenses in the appropriation entitled "Cemetery Realignment and Maintenance
Expenses".
01/14/2025 2:25:29 PM BSS011

SB74
Any carry forward of unexpended balance of funding as authorized herein, may
be carried forward under the following conditions:
(1) Prior to June 30, 2025 the Agency shall by written statement set forth
its reason(s) for the need to carry forward said funding to the Department
of Finance and Administration Office of Budget;
(2) The Department of Finance and Administration Office of Budget shall
report to the Arkansas Legislative Council all amounts carried forward by the
September Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee meeting
which report shall include the name of the Agency, Board, Commission or
Institution and the amount of the funding carried forward from the first
fiscal year to the second fiscal year, the program name or line item, the
funding source of that appropriation and a copy of the written request set
forth in (1) above;
(3) Each Agency, Board, Commission or Institution shall provide a written
report to the Arkansas Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee
containing all information set forth in item (2) above, along with a written
statement as to the current status of the project, contract, purpose etc. for
which the carry forward was originally requested no later than thirty (30)
days prior to the time the Agency, Board, Commission or Institution presents
its budget request to the Arkansas Legislative Council/Joint Budget
Committee; and
(4) Thereupon, the Department of Finance and Administration shall include
all information obtained in item (3) above in the budget manuals and/or a
statement of non-compliance by the Agency, Board, Commission or Institution.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2025
through June 30, 2026.

SECTION 15. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, or their successors, and other fiscal
control laws of this State, where applicable, and regulations promulgated by
the Department of Finance and Administration, as authorized by law, shall be
strictly complied with in disbursement of said funds.
01/14/2025 2:25:29 PM BSS011

SB74

SECTION 16. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 17. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits
the appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.















01/14/2025 2:25:29 PM BSS011